North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 7. Coastal Area Management.
§ 113A-116.
Local government letter of intent.

Within two years after July 1, 1974, each county and city within the coastal area shall submit to the Commission a written statement of its intent to act, or not to act, as a permit-letting agency under

G.S. 113A-121

. If any city or county states its intent not to act as a permit-letting agency or fails to submit a statement of intent within the required period, the Secretary shall issue permits therein under

G.S. 113A-121

; provided that a county may submit a letter of intent to issue permits in any city within said county that disclaims its intent to issue permits or fails to submit a letter of intent. Provided, however, should any city or county fail to become a permit-letting agency for any reason, but shall later express its desire to do so, it shall be permitted by the Coastal Resources Commission to qualify as such an agency by following the procedure herein set forth for qualification in the first instance.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, ss. 2, 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1989, c. 727, s. 129.

Express Review Pilot Program.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 11.4A(a)-(e), provides:

“(a) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may develop the Express Review Pilot Program, a pilot program to provide express permit and certification reviews. Participation in the Express Review Pilot Program is voluntary, and the program is to become supported by the fees determined pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall determine the project applications to review under the Express Review Pilot Program from those who request to participate in the Pilot Program. The Express Review Pilot Program may be applied to any one or all of the permits, approvals, or certifications in the following programs: the erosion and sedimentation control program, the coastal management program, and the water quality programs, including water quality certifications and stormwater management. The Express Review Pilot Program shall focus on the following permits or certifications:

“(1) Stormwater permits under Part 1 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

“(2)
Stream origination certifications under Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

“(3) Water quality certification under Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

“(4) Erosion and sedimentation control permits under Article 4 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes.

“(5) Permits under the Coastal Area Management Act (CAMA), Part 4 of Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes.

“(b) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may establish up to eight positions to administer the Express Review Pilot Program and may determine the fees for express application review under the Pilot Program. Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-215.3

D, the maximum permit application fee to be charged under subsection (a) of this section for the express review of a project application requiring all of the permits under subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500). Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-215.3

D, the maximum permit application fee to be charged for the express review of a project application requiring all of the permits under subdivisions (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500). Notwithstanding G.S. 143-215.3D, the maximum permit application fee charged for the express review of a project application for any other combination of permits under subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000). Express review of a project application involving additional permits or certifications issued by the Department of Environment and Natural Resources other than those under subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (a) of this section may be allowed by the Department, and, notwithstanding G.S. 143-215.3D or any other statute or rule that sets a permit fee, the maximum permit application fee charged for the express review of a project application shall not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), plus one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the fee that would otherwise apply by statute or rule for that particular permit or certification. Additional fees, not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the original permit application fee under this section, may be charged for subsequent reviews due to the insufficiency of the permit applications. The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may establish the procedure by which the amount of the fees under this subsection is determined, and the fees and procedures are not rules under G.S. 150B-2(8a) for the Express Review Pilot Program under this section.

“(c) The funds appropriated to the Department of Environment and Natural Resources in this act for the 2003-2004 fiscal year shall be used for the costs of implementing the Express Review Pilot Program under this section during the 2003-2004 fiscal year.

“(d) The Express Review Fund is created as a special nonreverting fund.
The Express Review Fund shall be used for the costs of implementing the Express Review Pilot Program under this section. All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the Express Review Fund. If the Express Review Pilot Program is abolished, the funds in the Express Review Fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

“(e) No later than May 1, 2004, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall report to the General Assembly its findings on the success of the Express Review Pilot Program and whether it recommends that the Pilot Program be continued or expanded.”

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 12.9(a)-(f), provides: “(a) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall continue the Express Review Pilot Program established by Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284 that was implemented in the Wilmington and Raleigh regional offices and shall expand the Express Review Pilot Program to two additional regional offices within the Department, to be selected by the Department based on the Department’s determination of where the Pilot Program is most needed.

“(b) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall continue and support the eight positions that were authorized under Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284 to administer the expanded Express Review Pilot Program under this section. This expanded Program and these positions and support shall be funded from the Express Review Fund, created by Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284.

“(c) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may establish and support four additional positions to administer the expanded Express Review Pilot Program under this section.
These positions and support may be funded for the 2004-2005 fiscal year from funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Environment and Natural Resources for this purpose. It is the intent of the General Assembly that these positions and support be funded in future fiscal years from the Express Review Fund.

“(d) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may establish and support four additional positions to administer the expanded Express Review Pilot Program under this section.
These positions and support shall be funded from the Express Review Fund, created by Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284.

“(e) No later than March 1, 2005, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall report to the Fiscal Research Division and the Environmental Review Commission its findings on the success of the continued Express Pilot Review Program and whether it recommends that the Program be continued or expanded and any other findings or recommendations, including any legislative proposals, that it deems pertinent.

“(f) Subsection (c) of this section becomes effective January 1, 2005.
The remaining subsections of this section become effective July 1, 2004.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 12.2(b), effective July 1, 2005, provides: “The Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall expand to a statewide program that operates in each regional office of the Department the Express Review Pilot Program established by Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284 and expanded by Section 12.9 of S.L. 2004-124, and the provisions of G.S. 143B-279.13, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section, shall apply to this statewide program.”

§ 113A-117.
Implementation and enforcement programs.

The Secretary shall develop and present to the Commission for consideration and to all cities and counties and lead regional organizations within the coastal area for comment a set of criteria for local implementation and enforcement programs. In the preparation of such criteria, the Secretary shall emphasize the necessity for the expeditious processing of permit applications. Said criteria may contain recommendations and guidelines as to the procedures to be followed in developing local implementation and enforcement programs, the scope and coverage of said programs, minimum standards to be prescribed in said programs, staffing of permit-letting agencies, permit-letting procedures, and priorities of regional or statewide concern. Within 20 months after July 1, 1974, the Commission shall adopt and transmit said criteria (with any revisions) to each coastal-area county and city that has filed an applicable letter of intent, for its guidance.

The governing body of each city in the coastal area that filed an affirmative letter of intent shall adopt an implementation and enforcement plan with respect to its zoning area within 36 months after July 1, 1974. The board of commissioners of each coastal-area county that filed an affirmative letter of intent shall adopt an implementation plan with respect to portions of the county outside city zoning areas within 36 months after July 1, 1974, provided, however, that a county implementation and enforcement plan may also cover city jurisdictions for those cities within the counties that have not filed affirmative letters of intent pursuant to

G.S. 113A-116

. Prior to adopting the implementation and enforcement program the local governing body shall hold a public hearing at which public and private parties shall have the opportunity to present comments and views. Notice of the hearing shall be given not less than 15 days before the date of the hearing, and shall state the date, time and place of the hearing, the subject of the hearing, and the action which is to be taken. The notice shall state that copies of the proposed implementation and enforcement program are available for public inspection at the county courthouse. Any such notice shall be published at least once in one newspaper of general circulation in the county at least 15 days before the date on which the public hearing is scheduled to begin.

Each coastal-area county and city shall transmit its implementation and enforcement program when adopted to the Commission for review. The Commission shall afford interested persons an opportunity to present objections and comments regarding the program, and shall review and consider each local implementation and enforcement program submitted in light of such objections and comments, the Commission’s criteria and any general standards of review applicable throughout the coastal area as may be adopted by the Commission. Within 45 days after receipt of a local implementation and enforcement program the Commission shall either approve the program or notify the county or city of the specific changes that must be made in order for it to be approved. Following such changes, the program may be resubmitted in the same manner as the original program.

If the Commission determines that any local government is failing to administer or enforce an approved implementation and enforcement program, it shall notify the local government in writing and shall specify the deficiencies of administration and enforcement. If the local government has not taken corrective action within 90 days of receipt of notification from the Commission, the Commission shall assume enforcement of the program until such time as the local government indicates its willingness and ability to resume administration and enforcement of the program.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, ss. 3, 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1989, c. 727, s. 130.

§ 113A-118.
Permit required.

After the date designated by the Secretary pursuant to

G.S. 113A-125

, every person before undertaking any development in any area of environmental concern shall obtain (in addition to any other required State or local permit) a permit pursuant to the provisions of this Part.

Under the expedited procedure provided for by

G.S. 113A-121

, the permit shall be obtained from the appropriate city or county for any minor development; provided, that if the city or county has not developed an approved implementation and enforcement program, the permit shall be obtained from the Secretary.

Permits shall be obtained from the Commission or its duly authorized agent.

Within the meaning of this Part:

A “major development” is any development which requires permission, licensing, approval, certification or authorization in any form from the Environmental Management Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Administration, the North Carolina Oil and Gas Commission, the North Carolina Pesticides Board, the North Carolina Sedimentation Control Board, or any federal agency or authority; or which occupies a land or water area in excess of 20 acres; or which contemplates drilling for or excavating natural resources on land or under water; or which occupies on a single parcel a structure or structures in excess of a ground area of 60,000 square feet.

A “minor development” is any development other than a “major development.”

If, within the meaning of G.S. 113A-103(5)b3, the siting of any utility facility for the development, generation or transmission of energy is subject to regulation under this Article rather than by the State Utilities Commission or by other law, permits for such facilities shall be obtained from the Coastal Resources Commission rather than from the appropriate city or county.

The Secretary may issue special emergency permits under this Article. These permits may only be issued in those extraordinary situations in which life or structural property is in imminent danger as a result of storms, sudden failure of man-made structures, or similar occurrence. These permits may carry any conditions necessary to protect the public interest, consistent with the emergency situation and the impact of the proposed development. If an application for an emergency permit includes work beyond that necessary to reduce imminent dangers to life or property, the emergency permit shall be limited to that development reasonably necessary to reduce the imminent danger; all further development shall be considered under ordinary permit procedures. This emergency permit authority of the Secretary shall extend to all development in areas of environmental concern, whether major or minor development, and the mandatory notice provisions of G.S. 113A-119(b) shall not apply to these emergency permits. To the extent feasible, these emergency permits shall be coordinated with any emergency permits required under G.S. 113-229(e1). The fees associated with any permit issued pursuant to this subsection or rules adopted pursuant to this subsection shall be waived.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 1282, ss. 23, 33; c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 253, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1983, c. 173; c. 518, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 136; 1989, c. 727, s. 131; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2007-485, s. 5; 2012-143, s. 1(d); 2014-4, s. 4(c); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Extension of Permits.

For provisions of the Permit Extension Act of 2009, Session Laws 2009-406, see the notes under G.S. 153A-344.1 and G.S. 160A-385.1.

For provisions pertaining to extension of permits during state of economic emergency in the real estate sector, pursuant to Session Laws 2009-406, ss. 1 through 5.1, as amended by Session Laws 2009-484, s. 5.1, 2009-550, s. 5.2, 2009-572, ss. 1-3, and Session Laws 2010-177, s. 1, see notes appearing under this catchline at G.S. 160A-385.1.

§ 113A-118.1.
General permits.

The Commission may, by rule, designate certain classes of major and minor development for which a general or blanket permit may be issued. In developing these rules, the Commission shall consider:

The size of the development;

The impact of the development on areas of environmental concern;

How often the class of development is carried out;

The need for onsite oversight of the development; and

The need for public review and comment on individual development projects.

General permits may be issued by the Commission. Individual developments carried out under the provisions of general permits shall not be subject to the mandatory notice provisions of

G.S. 113A-119

.

The Commission may impose reasonable notice provisions and other appropriate conditions and safeguards on any general permit it issues.

The variance, appeals, and enforcement provisions of this Article shall apply to any individual development projects undertaken under a general permit.

The Commission shall allow the use of riprap in the construction of groins in estuarine and public trust waters on the same basis as the Commission allows the use of wood.

History.

1983, c. 171; c. 442, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 137; 2002-126, s. 29.2(f).

§ 113A-118.2.
Development in Primary Nursery Areas and Outstanding Resource Waters areas of environmental concern.

Public notice, opportunity for public comment, and agency review shall be required for all development within the Primary Nursery Areas or Outstanding Resource Waters areas of environmental concern. Provided, however, that the Coastal Resources Commission may by rule exempt or issue general permits for minor maintenance and improvement projects as defined in G.S. 113A-103(5)c and for single-family residential development pursuant to use standards or conditions adopted by the Coastal Resources Commission.

History.

1989, c. 217, s. 2.

§ 113A-119.
Permit applications generally.

Any person required to obtain a permit under this Part shall file with the Secretary and (in the case of a permit sought from a city or county) with the designated local official an application for a permit in accordance with the form and content designated by the Secretary and approved by the Commission. The applicant must submit with the application an electronic payment, check, or money order payable to the Department or the city or county, as the case may be, constituting a fee set by the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 113A-119.1

.

Upon receipt of any application, a significant modification to an application for a major permit, or an application to modify substantially a previously issued major permit, the Secretary shall issue public notice of the proposed development (i) with the exception of minor permit applications, by posting or causing to be posted a notice at the location of the proposed development stating that an application, a modification of an application for a major permit, or an application to modify a previously issued major permit for development has been made, where the application or modification may be inspected, and the time period for comments; and (ii) with the exception of minor permit applications, by publishing notice of the application or modification at least once in one newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties wherein the development would be located at least 20 days before final action on a major permit or before the beginning of the hearing on a permit under

G.S. 113A-122

. The notice shall set out that any comments on the development should be submitted to the Secretary by a specified date, not less than 15 days from the date of the newspaper publication of the notice or 15 days after mailing of the mailed notice, whichever is later.

Within the meaning of this Part, the “designated local official” is the official who has been designated by the local governing body to receive and consider permit applications under this Part.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1983, c. 307; 1985, c. 372; 1989, c. 53; c. 727, s. 132; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 987, s. 1; 2013-413, s. 30; 2017-209, s. 5(b); 2020-74, s. 2; 2021-158, s. 2(a).

§ 113A-119.1.
Permit fees.

The Commission shall have the power to establish a graduated fee schedule for the processing of applications for permits, renewals of permits, modifications of permits, or transfers of permits issued pursuant to this Article. In determining the fee schedule, the Commission shall consider the administrative and personnel costs incurred by the Department for processing the applications, related compliance activities, and the complexity of the development sought to be undertaken for which a permit is required under this Article. The fee to be charged for processing an application may not exceed four hundred dollars ($400.00). The total funds collected from fees authorized by the Commission pursuant to this section in any fiscal year shall not exceed thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the total personnel and administrative costs incurred by the Department for permit processing and compliance programs within the Division of Coastal Area Management.

Fees collected under this section shall be applied to the costs of administering this Article.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991 (Regular Session, 1992), c. 1039, s. 4.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 987, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 4.

§ 113A-119.2.
Review of offshore fossil fuel facilities.

In addition to the definitions set out in

G.S. 113A-103

, as used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Coastal fishing waters” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 113-129

.

“Discharge” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 143-215.77

.

“Offshore fossil fuel facility” means those facilities for the exploration, development, or production of oil or natural gas which, because of their size, magnitude, or scope of impacts, have the potential to affect any land or water use or natural resource of the coastal area. For purposes of this definition, offshore fossil fuel facilities shall include, but are not limited to:

Structures, including drill ships and floating platforms and structures relocated from other states or countries, located in coastal fishing waters.

Any equipment associated with a structure described in sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision, including, but not limited to, pipelines and vessels that are used to carry, transport, or transfer oil, natural gas, liquid natural gas, liquid propane gas, or synthetic gas.

Onshore support or staging facilities associated with a structure described in sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.

“Oil” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 143-215.77

.

In addition to any other information necessary to determine consistency with State guidelines adopted pursuant to

G.S. 113A-107

, the following information is required for the review of an offshore fossil fuel facility located in coastal fishing waters:

All information required to be included in an Exploration Plan required pursuant to Subpart B of Part 250 of 30 C.F.R. (July 1, 2009 edition).

All information required to be included in an Oil-Spill Response Plan required pursuant to Subpart B of Part 254 of 30 C.F.R. (July 1, 2009 edition).

An assessment of alternatives to the proposed offshore fossil fuel facility that would minimize the likelihood of an unauthorized discharge.

An assessment of the potential for an unauthorized discharge to cause temporary or permanent violations of the federal and State water quality standards, including the antidegradation policy adopted pursuant to section 303(d) of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1313(d)).

Any other information that the Commission determines necessary for consistency review.

History.

2010-179, s. 2.

§ 113A-120.
Grant or denial of permits.

The responsible official or body shall deny an application for a permit upon finding:

In the case of coastal wetlands, that the development would contravene an order that has been or could be issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-230

.

In the case of estuarine waters, that a permit for the development would be denied pursuant to G.S. 113-229(e).

In the case of a renewable resource area, that the development will result in loss or significant reduction of continued long-range productivity that would jeopardize one or more of the water, food or fiber requirements of more than local concern identified in subdivisions a through c of G.S. 113A-113(b)(3).

In the case of a fragile or historic area, or other area containing environmental or natural resources of more than local significance, that the development will result in major or irreversible damage to one or more of the historic, cultural, scientific, environmental or scenic values or natural systems identified in subdivisions a through h of G.S. 113A-113(b)(4).

In the case of areas covered by G.S. 113A-113(b)(5), that the development will jeopardize the public rights or interests specified in said subdivision.

In the case of natural hazard areas, that the development would occur in one or more of the areas identified in subdivisions a through e of G.S. 113A-113(b)(6) in such a manner as to unreasonably endanger life or property.

In the case of areas which are or may be impacted by key facilities, that the development is inconsistent with the State guidelines or the local land-use plans, or would contravene any of the provisions of subdivisions (1) to (6) of this subsection.

In any case, that the development is inconsistent with the State guidelines or the local land-use plans.

In any case, that considering engineering requirements and all economic costs there is a practicable alternative that would accomplish the overall project purposes with less adverse impact on the public resources.

In any case, that the proposed development would contribute to cumulative effects that would be inconsistent with the guidelines set forth in subdivisions (1) through (9) of this subsection. Cumulative effects are impacts attributable to the collective effects of a number of projects and include the effects of additional projects similar to the requested permit in areas available for development in the vicinity.

In the absence of such findings, a permit shall be granted. The permit may be conditioned upon the applicant’s amending his proposal to take whatever measures or agreeing to carry out whatever terms of operation or use of the development that are reasonably necessary to protect the public interest with respect to the factors enumerated in subsection (a) of this section.

(b1)

In addition to those factors set out in subsection (a) of this section, and notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the responsible official or body may deny an application for a permit upon finding that an applicant, or any parent or subsidiary corporation if the applicant is a corporation:

Is conducting or has conducted any activity causing significant environmental damage for which a major development permit is required under this Article without having previously obtained such permit or has received a notice of violation with respect to any activity governed by this Article and has not complied with the notice within the time specified in the notice;

Has failed to pay a civil penalty assessed pursuant to this Article, a local ordinance adopted pursuant to this Article, or Article 17 of Chapter 113 of the General Statutes which is due and for which no appeal is pending;

Has been convicted of a misdemeanor pursuant to

G.S. 113A-126

, G.S. 113-229(k), or any criminal provision of a local ordinance adopted pursuant to this Article; or

Has failed to substantially comply with State rules or local ordinances and regulations adopted pursuant to this Article or with other federal and state laws, regulations, and rules for the protection of the environment.

(b2)

For purposes of subsection (b1) of this section, an applicant’s record may be considered for only the two years prior to the application date.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 676, s. 7.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1983, c. 518, ss. 4, 5; 1987, c. 827, s. 138; 1989, c. 51; c. 676, s. 7; 1997-337, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 55.2B; 1997-496, s. 2; 2000-172, s. 2.1.

§ 113A-120.1.
Variances.

Any person may petition the Commission for a variance granting permission to use the person’s land in a manner otherwise prohibited by rules or standards prescribed by the Commission, or orders issued by the Commission, pursuant to this Article. To qualify for a variance, the petitioner must show all of the following:

Unnecessary hardships would result from strict application of the rules, standards, or orders.

The hardships result from conditions that are peculiar to the property, such as the location, size, or topography of the property.

The hardships did not result from actions taken by the petitioner.

The requested variance is consistent with the spirit, purpose, and intent of the rules, standards, or orders; will secure public safety and welfare; and will preserve substantial justice.

The Commission may impose reasonable and appropriate conditions and safeguards upon any variance it grants.

History.

1989, c. 676, s. 8; 2002-68, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Wind Over North Carolina Waters:
The State’s Preparedness to Address Offshore and Coastal Water-Based Wind Energy Projects,” see 87 N.C.L. Rev. 1819 (2009).

§ 113A-120.2.

Expired April 1, 2001.

§ 113A-121.
Permits for minor developments under expedited procedures.

Applications for permits for minor developments shall be expeditiously processed so as to enable their promptest feasible disposition.

In cities and counties that have developed approved implementation and enforcement programs, applications for permits for minor developments shall be considered and determined by the designated local official of the city or county as the case may be. In cities and counties that have not developed approved implementation and enforcement programs, such applications shall be considered and determined by the Secretary. Minor development projects proposed to be undertaken by a local government within its own permit-letting jurisdiction shall be considered and determined by the Secretary.

Failure of the Secretary or the designated local official (as the case may be) to approve or deny an application for a minor permit within 25 days from receipt of application shall be treated as approval of the application, except that the Secretary or the designated local official (as the case may be) may extend the deadline by not more than an additional 25 days in exceptional cases. No waiver of the foregoing time limitation (or of the time limitation established in G.S. 113A-122(c)) shall be required of any applicant.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 913, s. 2.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 913, s. 2; c. 932, s. 2.1; 1983, c. 172, s. 1; c. 399; 1989, c. 727, s. 133.

§ 113A-121.1.
Administrative review of permit decisions.

An applicant for a minor or major development permit who is dissatisfied with the decision on his application may file a petition for a contested case hearing under

G.S. 150B-23

within 20 days after the decision is made. When a local official makes a decision to grant or deny a minor development permit and the Secretary is dissatisfied with the decision, the Secretary may file a petition for a contested case within 20 days after the decision is made.

A person other than a permit applicant or the Secretary who is dissatisfied with a decision to deny or grant a minor or major development permit may file a petition for a contested case hearing only if the Commission determines that a hearing is appropriate. A request for a determination of the appropriateness of a contested case hearing shall be made in writing and received by the Commission within 20 days after the disputed permit decision is made. A determination of the appropriateness of a contested case shall be made within 30 days after a request for a determination is received and shall be based on whether the person seeking to commence a contested case:

Has alleged that the decision is contrary to a statute or rule;

Is directly affected by the decision; and

Has alleged facts or made legal arguments that demonstrate that the request for the hearing is not frivolous.If the Commission determines a contested case is appropriate, the petition for a contested case shall be filed within 20 days after the Commission makes its determination. A determination that a person may not commence a contested case is a final agency decision and is subject to judicial review under Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If, on judicial review, the court determines that the Commission erred in determining that a contested case would not be appropriate, the court shall remand the matter for a contested case hearing under

G.S. 150B-23

and final decision on the permit pursuant to

G.S. 113A-122

. Decisions in such cases shall be rendered pursuant to those rules, regulations, and other applicable laws in effect at the time of the commencement of the contested case.

When the applicant seeks administrative review of a decision concerning a permit under subsection (a) of this section, the permit is suspended from the time a person seeks administrative review of the decision concerning the permit until the Commission makes a final decision in the contested case, and no action may be taken during that time that would be unlawful in the absence of a permit.

A permit challenged under subsection (b) of this section remains in effect unless a stay is issued by the administrative law judge as set forth in

G.S. 150B-33

or by a reviewing court as set forth in

G.S. 150B-48

.

History.

1981, c. 913, s. 3; 1983, c. 400, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 139; 1995, c. 409, s. 1; 2011-398, s. 37; 2014-120, s. 23; 2021-158, s. 3(a).

Local Modification.

New Hanover: 1998-212, s. 14.9D.

§ 113A-122.
Procedure for hearings on permit decisions.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 140.

The following provisions shall be applicable in connection with hearings pursuant to this section:

, (2) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 140.

(3)

A full and complete record of all proceedings at any hearing under this section shall be taken by a reporter appointed by the Commission or by other method approved by the Attorney General. Any party to a proceeding shall be entitled to a copy of such record upon the payment of the reasonable cost thereof as determined by the Commission.

(4)

to (6) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 140.

(7)

The burden of proof at any hearing on a decision granting a permit shall be upon the person who requested the hearing.

(8), (9) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 140.

(10)

The Commission shall grant or deny the permit in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 113A-120

. All such orders and decisions of the Commission shall set forth separately the Commission’s findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall, wherever necessary, cite the appropriate provision of law or other source of authority on which any action or decision of the Commission is based.

(11)

The Commission shall have the authority to adopt a seal which shall be the seal of said Commission and which shall be judicially noticed by the courts of the State. Any document, proceeding, order, decree, special order, rule, rule of procedure or any other official act or records of the Commission or its minutes may be certified by the Executive Director under his hand and the seal of the Commission and when so certified shall be received in evidence in all actions or proceedings in the courts of the State without further proof of the identity of the same if such records are competent, relevant and material in any such action to proceedings. The Commission shall have the right to take official notice of all studies, reports, statistical data or any other official reports or records of the federal government or of any sister state and all such records, reports and data may be placed in evidence by the Commission or by any other person or interested party where material, relevant and competent.

Failure of the Commission to approve or deny an application for a permit pursuant to this section within 75 days from receipt of application shall be treated as approval of the application, except the Commission may extend the deadline by not more than an additional 75 days in exceptional cases.Failure of the Commission to dispose of an appeal pursuant to this section within 90 days from notice of appeal shall be treated as approval of the action appealed from, except that the Commission may extend the deadline by not more than an additional 90 days if necessary to properly consider the appeal.

All notices which are required to be given by the Secretary or Commission or by any party to a proceeding under this section shall be given by registered or certified mail to all persons entitled thereto. The date of receipt or refusal for such registered or certified mail shall be the date when such notice is deemed to have been given. Notice by the Commission may be given to any person upon whom a summons may be served in accordance with the provisions of law covering civil actions in the superior courts of this State. The Commission may prescribe the form and content of any particular notice.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1979, c. 253, s. 6; 1981, c. 913, ss. 4-6; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1983, c. 172, s. 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 140.